class-C/C3.foma
### sinhalaC1.foma ###

read lexc C3.lexc
define Lexicon;


define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය |ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ේ ය |
 ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා ];    

define C [ ව ේ|ු ණ ු  | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි ]; 

define D [ ් ද | ් ද ෙ ම ි| ් ද ෙ ම ු | ් ද ෙ හ ි | ් ද ෙ හ ු | ් ද ේ ය | ් ද ා ය | ් ද ෝ ය ];



######### Rewrite rules

define CCRule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [B | C | D] ;
define CCRule5  ඳ -> න || _ "^" [D];
define CCRule4  [..] -> ැ ||  A _ A A "^" [C | D];


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define C1Grammar 	Lexicon .o.
		CCRule1		.o.
		CCRule4		.o.
		CCRule5		.o.
		Cleanup;

regex C1Grammar;
